test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-4w-mihko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mihko : :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      mihko+N+I+Sg: mihko   #  a blood
      mihko+N+I+Pl: mihkwa   #  bloods
      mihko+N+I+Loc: mihkohk   #  in a blood

      # Poss
      mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimihkom   #  my blood
      mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omihkom   #  his/her blood
      

      # Nonposs
      mihko+N+I+Sg: mihko   #  a blood
      mihko+N+I+Pl: mihkwa   #  bloods
      mihko+N+I+Loc: mihkohk   #  in a blood
      

      # Der/Dim
      mihko+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: mihkos   #  a little blood
      

      # Poss # Sg
      mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimihkom   #  my blood
      mihko+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kimihkom   #  your blood
      mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omihkom   #  his/her blood
      mihko+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nimihkominân   #  our blood
      mihko+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kimihkominaw   #  your and our blood
      mihko+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kimihkomiwâw   #  your blood
      mihko+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: omihkomiwâw   #  their blood
      mihko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: omihkomithiw   #  another's/others' blood
      

      # Poss # Pl
      mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimihkoma   #  my bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kimihkoma   #  your bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: omihkoma   #  his/her bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimihkominâna   #  our bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kimihkominawa   #  your and our bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kimihkomiwâwa   #  your bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: omihkomiwâwa   #  their bloods
      mihko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: omihkomithiwa   #  another's/others' bloods
      

      # Poss # Loc
      mihko+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nimihkomihk   #  in my blood
      mihko+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kimihkomihk   #  in your blood
      mihko+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: omihkomihk   #  in his/her blood
      mihko+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nimihkominâhk   #  in our blood
      mihko+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc: kimihkominâhk   #  in your and our blood
      mihko+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kimihkomiwâhk   #  in your blood
      mihko+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: omihkomiwâhk   #  in their blood
      mihko+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: omihkomithihk   #  in another's/others' blood
      
